California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(1) Ensuring the extent, kind, and quality of counseling performed is consistent with the education, training, and experience of the supervisee.

(2) Monitoring and evaluating the supervisee’s assessment, diagnosis, and treatment decisions and providing regular feedback.

(3) Monitoring and evaluating the supervisee’s ability to provide services at the site or sites where the supervisee is practicing and to the particular clientele being served.

(4) Monitoring and addressing
 clinical dynamics, including, but not limited to, countertransference-, intrapsychic-, interpersonal-, or trauma-related issues that may affect the supervisory or the practitioner-patient relationship.

(5) Ensuring the supervisee’s compliance with laws and regulations governing the practice of clinical social work.

(6) Reviewing the supervisee’s progress notes, process notes, and other patient treatment records, as deemed appropriate by the supervisor.

(7) With the client’s written consent, providing direct observation or review of audio or video recordings of the supervisee’s counseling or therapy, as deemed appropriate by the supervisor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 511, Sec. 30.   (SB 1495)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

4996.21.

The board may audit the records of any supervisor to verify the completion of the supervisor qualifications specified by this chapter and by regulation. A supervisor shall maintain records of completion of the required supervisor qualifications for seven years after termination of supervision and shall make these records available to the board for auditing purposes upon request.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 743, Sec. 30.   (AB 93)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

4996.22.

(a) (1) Except as provided in subdivision (d), the board shall not renew any license pursuant to this chapter unless the applicant certifies to the board, on a form prescribed by the board, that the applicant has completed not less than 36 hours of approved continuing education in or relevant to the field of social work in the preceding two years, as determined by the board.

(2) The board shall not renew any license of an applicant who began graduate study before January 1, 2004, pursuant to this chapter unless the applicant certifies to the board that during the applicant’s first renewal period after the operative date of this section, the applicant completed a continuing education course in spousal or partner abuse assessment, detection,
 and intervention strategies, including community resources, cultural factors, and same gender abuse dynamics. On and after January 1, 2005, the course shall consist of not less than seven hours of training. Equivalent courses in spousal or partner abuse assessment, detection, and intervention strategies taken before the operative date of this section or proof of equivalent teaching or practice experience may be submitted to the board and, at its discretion, may be accepted in satisfaction of this requirement. Continuing education courses taken pursuant to this paragraph shall be applied to the 36 hours of approved continuing education required under paragraph (1).

(3) The board shall not renew any registration pursuant to this chapter unless the registrant certifies under penalty of perjury to the board, and on a form prescribed by the board, that they have completed not less than three hours of continuing education in the subject of California
 law and ethics during the preceding year.

(b) (1) In determining its continuing education requirements, the board shall consider including a course in menopausal mental health.

(2) In determining its continuing education requirements, the board shall consider including a course in maternal mental health.

(c) The board shall have the right to audit the records of any applicant to verify the completion of the continuing education requirement. Applicants shall maintain records of completion of required continuing education coursework for a minimum of two years and shall make these records available to the board for auditing purposes upon request.

(d) The board may establish exceptions from the continuing education requirement of this
 section for good cause as defined by the board.

(e) The continuing education shall be obtained from one of the following sources:

(1) An accredited school of social work, as defined in Section 4991.2, or a school or department of social work that is a candidate for accreditation by the Commission on Accreditation of the Council on Social Work Education. Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed as requiring coursework to be offered as part of a regular degree program.

(2) A school, college, or university accredited by a regional or national institutional accrediting agency that is recognized by the United States Department of Education or a school, college, or university that is approved by the Bureau for Private Postsecondary Education.

(3) Another
 continuing education provider, as specified by the board by regulation.

(f) The board shall establish, by regulation, a procedure for identifying acceptable providers of continuing education courses, and all providers of continuing education, as described in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (e), shall adhere to the procedures established by the board. The board may revoke or deny the right of a provider to offer continuing education coursework pursuant to this section for failure to comply with this section or any regulation adopted pursuant to this section.

(g) Training, education, and coursework by approved providers shall incorporate one or more of the following:

(1) Aspects of the discipline that are fundamental to the understanding, or the practice, of social work.

(2) Aspects of the social work discipline in which significant recent developments have occurred.

(3) Aspects of other related disciplines that enhance the understanding, or the practice, of social work.

(h) A system of continuing education for licensed clinical social workers shall include courses directly related to the diagnosis, assessment, and treatment of the client population being served.

(i) The continuing education requirements of this section shall comply fully with the guidelines for mandatory continuing education established by the Department of Consumer Affairs pursuant to Section 166.

(j) The board may adopt regulations as necessary to implement this
 section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 67, Sec. 8.   (AB 1170)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4996.23.

(a) To qualify for licensure, each applicant shall complete 3,000 hours of post-master’s degree supervised experience related to the practice of clinical social work. Except as provided in subdivision (b), experience shall not be gained until the applicant is registered as an associate clinical social worker.

(b) Postdegree hours of experience gained before the issuance of an associate registration shall be credited toward licensure if all of the following apply:

(1) The registration applicant applies for the associate registration and the board receives the application within 90 days of the granting of the qualifying
 master’s or doctoral degree.

(2) For applicants completing graduate study on or after January 1, 2020, the experience is obtained at a workplace that, prior to the registration applicant gaining supervised experience hours, requires completed Live Scan fingerprinting. The applicant shall provide the board with a copy of that completed “State of California Request for Live Scan Service” form with the application for licensure.

(3) The board subsequently grants the associate registration.

(c) The applicant shall not be employed or volunteer in a private practice or a professional corporation until the applicant has been issued an associate registration by the board.

(d) The experience shall be as follows:

(1) (A) At least 1,700 hours shall be gained under the supervision of a licensed clinical social worker. The remaining required supervised experience may be gained under the supervision of a physician and surgeon who is certified in psychiatry by the American Board of Psychiatry and Neurology, licensed professional clinical counselor, licensed marriage and family therapist, psychologist licensed pursuant to Chapter 6.6 (commencing with Section 2900), licensed educational psychologist, or licensed clinical social worker.

(B) A maximum of 1,200 hours gained under the supervision of a licensed educational psychologist providing educationally related mental health services that are consistent with the scope of
 practice of an educational psychologist, as specified in Section 4989.14.

(2) A minimum of 2,000 hours in clinical psychosocial diagnosis, assessment, and treatment, including psychotherapy or counseling; however, at least 750 hours shall be face-to-face individual or group psychotherapy provided in the context of clinical social work services.

(3) A maximum of 1,000 hours in client-centered advocacy, consultation, evaluation, research, direct supervisor contact, and workshops, seminars, training sessions, or conferences directly related to clinical social work that have been approved by the applicant’s supervisor.

(4) A minimum of two years of supervised experience is required to be obtained over a period of not
 less than 104 weeks and shall have been gained within the six years immediately preceding the date on which the application for licensure was received by the board.

(5) No more than 40 hours of experience may be credited in any seven consecutive days.

(6) For hours gained on or after January 1, 2010, no more than six hours of supervision, whether individual, triadic, or group supervision, shall be credited during any single week.

(e) An individual who submits an application for licensure between January 1, 2016, and December 31, 2020, may alternatively qualify under the experience requirements of this section that were in place on January 1, 2015.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 747, Sec. 14.   (AB 690)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4996.23.1.

(a) Except for experience gained by attending workshops, seminars, training sessions, or conferences, as described in paragraph (3) of subdivision (d) of Section 4996.23, direct supervisor contact shall occur as follows:

(1) Supervision shall include at least one hour of direct supervisor contact each week for which experience is credited in each work setting.

(2) An associate gaining experience who performs more than 10 hours of services pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 4996.23 in a week in any setting shall receive at least one additional hour of direct supervisor contact for that setting.

(b) (1) For purposes of this chapter, “one hour of direct supervisor contact” means any of the following:

(A) Individual supervision, which means one hour of face-to-face contact between one supervisor and one person receiving supervision for providing clinical mental health services.

(B) Triadic supervision, which means one hour of face-to-face contact between one supervisor and two persons receiving supervision for providing clinical mental health services.

(C) Group supervision, which means two hours of face-to-face contact between one supervisor and no more than eight persons receiving supervision for providing clinical mental health
 services. Segments of group supervision may be split into no less than one continuous hour. A supervisor shall ensure that the amount and degree of supervision is appropriate for each person in the group.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, “face-to-face contact” means in-person contact, contact via two-way, real-time videoconferencing, or some combination of these.

(c) The supervisor shall be responsible for ensuring compliance with federal and state laws relating to confidentiality of patient health information.

(d) (1) Within 60 days of the commencement of supervision, a supervisor shall conduct a meeting with the supervisee during which the supervisor shall assess the appropriateness of allowing
 the supervisee to receive supervision via two-way, real-time videoconferencing. This assessment of appropriateness shall include, but is not limited to, the abilities of the supervisee, the preferences of both the supervisee and supervisor, and the privacy of the locations of the supervisee and supervisor while supervision is conducted.

(2) The supervisor shall document the results of the assessment made pursuant to paragraph (1), and shall not utilize supervision via two-way, real-time videoconferencing if their assessment finds it is not appropriate.

(e) Direct supervisor contact shall occur within the same week as the hours claimed.

(f) Of the 104 weeks of required supervision, 52 weeks shall be individual
 supervision, triadic supervision, or a combination of both.

(g) Of the 52 weeks of required individual or triadic supervision, no less than 13 weeks shall be supervised by a licensed clinical social worker.

(h) Alternative supervision may be arranged during a supervisor’s vacation or sick leave if the alternative supervision meets the requirements of this chapter.

(i) Notwithstanding any other law, once the required number of experience hours are gained, an associate clinical social worker or applicant for licensure shall receive a minimum of one hour of direct supervisor contact per week for each practice setting in which direct clinical counseling is performed. Once the required number of experience hours are
 gained, further supervision for nonclinical practice, as described in paragraph (3) of subdivision (d) of Section 4996.23, shall be at the supervisor’s discretion.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 160, Sec. 8) by Stats. 2025, Ch. 787, Sec. 82.   (SB 775)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4996.23.2.

(a) An associate clinical social worker or applicant for licensure shall only perform mental health and related services as an employee or as a volunteer, not as an independent contractor. The requirements of this chapter regarding hours of experience and supervision shall apply equally to employees and volunteers. An associate or applicant for licensure shall not perform any services or gain any experience within the scope of practice of the profession, as defined in Section 4996.9, as an independent contractor. While an associate may be either a paid employee or a volunteer, employers are encouraged to provide fair remuneration.

(1) If employed, an associate shall provide the board,
 upon application for licensure, with copies of the corresponding W-2 tax forms for each year of experience claimed. For experience gained during a tax year that has not ended by the date the associate’s application for licensure is received by the board, the associate shall provide the board with a copy of their most recent pay stub.

(2) If volunteering, an associate shall provide the board, upon application for licensure, with a letter from their employer verifying the associate’s status as a volunteer during the dates the experience was gained.

(b) Employment in a private practice or professional corporation shall not commence until the applicant has been registered as an associate clinical social worker.

(c) Experience
 shall only be gained in a setting that meets both of the following:

(1) Lawfully and regularly provides clinical social work, mental health counseling, or psychotherapy.

(2) Provides oversight to ensure that the associate’s work at the setting meets the experience and supervision requirements set forth in this chapter and is within the scope of practice for the profession as defined in Section 4996.9.

(d) Only experience gained in the position for which the associate clinical social worker volunteers or is employed shall qualify as supervised experience.

(e) Any experience obtained under the supervision of a spouse or relative by blood or marriage shall not be
 credited toward the required hours of supervised experience. Any experience obtained under the supervision of a supervisor with whom the applicant has had or currently has a personal, professional, or business relationship that undermines the authority or effectiveness of the supervision shall not be credited toward the required hours of supervised experience.

(f) An associate clinical social worker or applicant for licensure who provides voluntary services in any lawful work setting and who only receives reimbursement for expenses actually incurred shall be considered an employee. The board may audit an applicant for licensure who receives reimbursement for expenses and the applicant shall have the burden of demonstrating that the payments received were for reimbursement of expenses actually incurred.

(g) An associate clinical social worker or applicant for licensure who receives a stipend or educational loan repayment from a program designed to encourage demographically underrepresented groups to enter the profession or to improve recruitment and retention in underserved regions or settings shall be considered an employee. The board may audit an applicant who receives a stipend or educational loan repayment and the applicant shall have the burden of demonstrating that the payments received were for the specified purposes.

(h) An associate or applicant for licensure shall not receive any remuneration from patients or clients and shall only be paid by their employer, if an employee.

(i) An associate or applicant for
 licensure shall have no proprietary interest in their employer’s business and shall not lease or rent space, pay for furnishings, equipment, or supplies, or in any other way pay for the obligations of their employer.

(j) An associate may provide services via telehealth that are in the scope of practice as outlined in this chapter.

(k) Each educational institution preparing applicants pursuant to this chapter shall consider requiring, and shall encourage, its students to undergo individual, marital, conjoint, family, or group counseling or psychotherapy, as appropriate. Each supervisor shall consider, advise, and encourage their supervisees regarding the advisability of undertaking individual, marital, conjoint, family, or group counseling or psychotherapy, as appropriate. Insofar as it
 is deemed appropriate and is desired by the applicant, educational institutions and supervisors are encouraged to assist the applicant to locate counseling or psychotherapy at a reasonable cost.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 787, Sec. 84.   (SB 775)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4996.23.3.

(a) An associate clinical social worker or an applicant for licensure shall only perform mental health and related services at the places where their employer permits business to be conducted.

(b) An associate who is employed by, or volunteering in, a private practice or a professional corporation shall be supervised by an individual who is both of the following:

(1) Is employed by or contracted by the associate’s employer or is an owner of the private practice or professional corporation.

(2) Either provides psychotherapeutic services to clients for the associate’s
 employer, or meets both of the following:

(A) The supervisor and the associate’s employer have a written contract providing the supervisor the same access to the associate’s clinical records provided to employees of that employer.

(B) The associate’s clients authorize the release of their clinical records to the supervisor.

(c) At any one time, supervisors in nonexempt settings shall not serve as individual or triadic supervisors for more than a total of six persons who are not fully licensed at the highest level for independent clinical practice and who are receiving supervision for providing clinical mental health services in a nonexempt
 setting.

(d) A written oversight agreement, as specified by the board by regulation, shall be executed between the supervisor and employer when the supervisor is not employed by the supervisee’s employer or is a volunteer. The supervisor shall evaluate the site or sites where the supervisee will be gaining experience to determine that the site or sites comply with the requirements of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 160, Sec. 10.   (SB 1024)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

4996.25.

(a) Any applicant for licensure as a licensed clinical social worker who began graduate study on or after January 1, 2004, shall complete, as a condition of licensure, a minimum of 10 contact hours of coursework in aging and long-term care, which could include, but is not limited to, the biological, social, and psychological aspects of aging. On and after January 1, 2012, this coursework shall include
 instruction on the assessment and reporting of, as well as treatment related to, elder and dependent adult abuse and neglect.

(b) Coursework taken in fulfillment of other educational requirements for licensure pursuant to this chapter, or in a separate course of study, may, at the discretion of the board, fulfill the requirements of this section.

(c) In order to satisfy the coursework requirement of this section, the applicant shall submit to the board a certification from the chief academic officer of the educational institution from which the applicant graduated stating that the coursework required by this section is included within the institution’s required curriculum for graduation, or within the coursework, that was completed by the applicant.

(d) The board shall not issue a license to the applicant until the
 applicant has met the requirements of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 552, Sec. 7.   (AB 2435)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

4996.26.

(a) A licensee who began graduate study prior to January 1, 2004, shall complete a three-hour continuing education course in aging and long-term care during his or her first renewal period after the operative date of this section, and shall submit to the board evidence acceptable to the board of the person’s satisfactory completion of the course.

(b) The course shall include, but is not limited to, the biological, social, and psychological aspects of aging. On and after January 1, 2012, this coursework shall include instruction on the assessment and reporting of, as well as treatment related to, elder and dependent adult abuse and neglect.

(c) Any person seeking to meet the requirements of subdivision (a) of this section may submit to the board a certificate evidencing completion of equivalent courses in aging and long-term care taken prior to the operative date of this section, or proof of equivalent teaching or practice experience. The board, in its discretion, may accept that certification as meeting the requirements of this section.

(d) The board may not renew an applicant’s license until the applicant has met the requirements of this section.

(e) Continuing education courses taken pursuant to this section shall be applied to the 36 hours of approved continuing education required in Section 4996.22.

(f) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2005.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 552, Sec. 8.   (AB 2435)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

4996.27.

(a) On or after January 1, 2021, an applicant for licensure as a clinical social worker shall show, as part of the application, that they have completed a minimum of six hours of coursework or applied experience under supervision in suicide risk assessment and intervention. This requirement shall be met in one of the following ways:

(1) Obtained as part of their qualifying graduate degree program. To satisfy this requirement, the applicant shall submit to the board a written certification from the registrar or training director of the educational institution or program from which the applicant graduated stating that the coursework required by this section is included within the
 institution’s curriculum required for graduation at the time the applicant graduated, or within the coursework that was completed by the applicant.

(2) Obtained as part of their applied experience. Applied experience can be met in any of the following settings: practicum or associateship that meets the requirement of this chapter, formal postdoctoral placement that meets the requirements of Section 2911, or other qualifying supervised experience. To satisfy this requirement, the applicant shall submit to the board a written certification from the director of training for the program or primary supervisor where the qualifying experience has occurred stating that the training required by this section is included within the applied experience.

(3) By taking a continuing education
 course that meets the requirements of Section 4996.22. To satisfy this requirement, the applicant shall submit to the board a certification of completion.

(b) As a one-time requirement, a licensee prior to the time of their first renewal after January 1, 2021, or an applicant for reactivation or reinstatement to an active license status on or after January 1, 2021, shall have completed a minimum of six hours of coursework or applied experience under supervision in suicide risk assessment and intervention, using one of the methods specified in subdivision (a). Proof of compliance with this section shall be certified under penalty of perjury that they are in compliance with this section and shall be retained for submission to the board upon request.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 511, Sec. 31.   (SB 1495)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

4996.27.1.

(a) On or after July 1, 2023, an applicant for licensure as a clinical social worker shall show, as part of the application, that they have completed a minimum of three hours of training or coursework in the provision of mental health services via telehealth, which shall include law and ethics related to telehealth. This requirement shall be met in one of the following ways:

(1) Obtained as part of their qualifying graduate degree program. To satisfy this requirement, the applicant shall submit to the board a written certification from the registrar or training director of the educational institution or program from which the applicant graduated stating that the coursework required by this section is included within the institution’s
 curriculum required for graduation at the time the applicant graduated, or within the coursework that was completed by the applicant.

(2) Obtained by completing a continuing education course that meets the requirements of Section 4996.22. To satisfy this requirement, the applicant shall submit to the board a certification of completion.

(b) As a one-time requirement, a licensee before the time of their first renewal after July 1, 2023, or an applicant for reactivation or reinstatement to an active license status on or after July 1, 2023, shall have completed a minimum of three hours of training or coursework in the provision of mental health services via telehealth, which shall include law and ethics related to telehealth, using one of the methods specified in subdivision (a)

(c) Proof of compliance with subdivision
 (b) shall be certified under penalty of perjury that they are in compliance with this section and shall be retained for submission to the board upon request.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 520, Sec. 10.   (AB 1759)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

4996.28.

(a) Registration as an associate clinical social worker shall expire one year from the last day of the month during which it was issued. To renew a registration, the registrant shall, on or before the expiration date of the registration, complete all of the following actions:

(1) Apply for renewal on a form prescribed by the board.

(2) Pay a renewal fee prescribed by the board.

(3) Notify the board whether they have been convicted, as
 defined in Section 490, of a misdemeanor or felony, and whether any disciplinary action has been taken by a regulatory or licensing board in this or any other state, subsequent to the last renewal of the registration.

(4) Participate in the California law and ethics examination pursuant to Section 4992.09 each year until successful completion of this examination.

(5) Certify under penalty of perjury their compliance with the continuing education requirements set forth in Section 4996.22.

(b) An expired registration may be renewed by completing all of the actions described in paragraphs (1) to
 (5), inclusive, of subdivision (a).

(c) A registration as an associate clinical social worker may be renewed a maximum of five times. No registration shall be renewed or reinstated beyond six years from the last day of the month during which the registration was issued, regardless of whether the registration has been revoked. When no further renewals are possible, an applicant may apply for and obtain a subsequent associate clinical social worker registration number if the applicant meets all requirements for registration in effect at the time of their application for a subsequent associate clinical social worker registration number and has passed the California law and ethics examination pursuant to
 Section 4992.09. An applicant issued a subsequent associate registration number pursuant to this subdivision shall not be employed or volunteer in a private practice.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 520, Sec. 11.   (AB 1759)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

4997.

(a) A licensee may apply to the board to request that his or her license be placed on inactive status.

(b) A licensee on inactive status shall be subject to this chapter and shall not engage in the practice of clinical social work in this state.

(c) A licensee who holds an inactive license shall pay a biennial fee in the amount of one-half of the standard renewal fee and shall be exempt from continuing education
 requirements.

(d) A licensee on inactive status who has not committed an act or crime constituting grounds for denial of licensure may, upon request, restore his or her license to practice clinical social work to active status.

(1) A licensee requesting his or her license be restored to active status between renewal cycles shall pay the remaining one-half of his or her renewal fee.

(2) A licensee requesting to restore his or her license to active status whose license will expire less than one year from the date of the request shall complete 18 hours of continuing education as specified in Section 4996.22.

(3) A licensee requesting to restore his or her license to active status whose license will expire more than one year from the date of the request
 shall complete 36 hours of continuing education as specified in Section 4996.22.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 588, Sec. 88.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

4997.1.

(a) (1) The board shall issue, upon submission of a completed application as prescribed by this section and payment of the fee fixed by this chapter, a retired license to a licensed clinical social worker who holds a license that is current and active or a license that is inactive, and whose license is not suspended, revoked, or otherwise punitively restricted by the board or subject to disciplinary action under this chapter.

(2) A clinical social worker license that has expired shall be issued a retired license by the board upon submission of a completed application as prescribed by this section and payment of the fee fixed by this chapter if all of the following
 requirements are met:

(A) The license expired within three years from the date of the board’s receipt of a completed application.

(B) Immediately preceding the license expiration, and after the license expiration, the license was not suspended, revoked, or otherwise punitively restricted by the board or subject to disciplinary action under this chapter.

(3) For purposes of this section, “subject to disciplinary action” shall mean that the licensee had an unsatisfied cost recovery, fine or restitution order, an accusation or petition to revoke probation that has been served on the licensee alleging violations of their probation or the chapter, or an unresolved complaint or investigation pending with the
 board.

(b) To apply for a retired license, the applicant shall submit a completed application to the board providing all of the following information:

(1) Full name as filed with the board.

(2) Board license type, license number, and expiration date.

(3) Date of birth.

(4) Social security number or individual taxpayer identification number.

(5) A statement signed under penalty of perjury that the information provided on the application is true and correct, that the applicant understands that the holder of a retired license may not engage
 in any activity for which the active license was issued, and that the applicant hereby requests their license to be changed to retired status. 

(c) The holder of a retired license issued pursuant to this section shall not engage in any activity for which an active clinical social worker license is required.

(d) The holder of a retired license shall utilize their professional title only with the unabbreviated word “retired” directly preceding or directly following the professional title. 

(e) The holder of a retired license shall not be required to renew that license.

(f) The holder of a retired license may apply to restore to active status their license to
 practice clinical social work if that retired license was issued less than three years prior to the date the application to restore the retired license is received by the board. A retired license may be restored to active status one time only. To restore a retired license to active status, the applicant shall meet all of the following requirements:

(1) Submits a completed application to the board containing all of the following information:

(A) Full name as filed with the board.

(B) Original board license type and original license number and expiration date.

(C) Date of birth.

(D) Social
 security number or individual taxpayer identification number.

(E) Whether they have been convicted, as defined in Section 490, of a misdemeanor or felony, or whether any disciplinary action has been taken by any regulatory or licensing board in this or any other state, subsequent to the issuance of the retired license.

(F) A statement signed under penalty of perjury that the information provided on the application is true and correct, that the applicant did not engage in any activity for which an active license is required while the license was in retired status, and that the applicant hereby requests their license to be changed to “active” status. 

(2) Has not committed an act or crime constituting grounds for denial
 of licensure.

(3) Pays the required renewal fee.

(4) Completes the required continuing education as specified in Section 4996.22.

(5) Complies with the fingerprint submission requirements established in Section 144.

(g) An applicant requesting to restore their license pursuant to subdivision (f) whose retired license was issued in accordance with this section less than one year from the date the application to restore the retired license is received by the board shall complete 18 hours of continuing education taken within the two years prior to the date the application to restore the retired license is received by the board. The coursework shall include a
 minimum of six hours in the subject of California law and ethics.

(h) An applicant requesting to restore their license pursuant to subdivision (f) whose retired license was issued in accordance with this section one or more years from the date the application to restore the retired license is received by the board shall complete 36 hours of continuing education taken within the two years prior to the date the application to restore the retired license is received by the board. This coursework shall include a minimum of six hours in the subject of California law and ethics.

(i) A retired license that was issued three or more years prior shall not be restored. The holder of the retired license may apply for and obtain a new license if all of the following criteria are satisfied:

(1) Has not committed an act or crime constituting grounds for
 denial of licensure.

(2) Applies for licensure and pays the required fees.

(3) Passes the examinations required for licensure.

(4) Complies with the fingerprint submission requirements established in Section 144.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 787, Sec. 85.   (SB 775)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Licensed Clinical Social Workers Corporations [4998. - 4998.5.]

4998.

A licensed clinical social worker corporation is a corporation that is authorized to render professional services, as defined in Section 13401 of the Corporations Code, so long as that corporation and its shareholders, officers, directors, and employees rendering professional services are in compliance with the Moscone-Knox Professional Corporation Act (Part 4 (commencing with Section 13400) of Division 3 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code), this article, and all other statutes and regulations now or hereafter enacted or adopted pertaining to that corporation and the conduct of its affairs. With respect to a licensed clinical social worker corporation, the governmental agency referred to in the Moscone-Knox Professional Corporation Act is the Board of Behavioral Sciences.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 647, Sec. 58.   (SB 801)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4998.1.

It shall constitute unprofessional conduct and a violation of this chapter for any person licensed under this chapter to violate, attempt to violate, directly or indirectly, or assist in or abet the violation of, or conspire to violate, any provision or term of this article, the Moscone-Knox Professional Corporation Act (Part 4 (commencing with Section 13400) of Division 3 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code), or any regulations duly adopted under those laws.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 657, Sec. 18.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

4998.2.

Notwithstanding Section 4996, the name of a licensed clinical social worker corporation and any name or names under which it may be rendering professional services shall contain the words “licensed clinical social worker” and wording or abbreviations denoting corporate existence.

A licensed clinical social worker corporation that conducts business under a fictitious business name shall not use any name that is false, misleading, or deceptive, and shall inform the patient, prior to the commencement of treatment, that the business is conducted by a licensed clinical social worker corporation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 647, Sec. 59.   (SB 801)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4998.3.

Except as provided in Section 13403 of the Corporations Code, each director, shareholder, and officer of a licensed clinical social worker corporation shall be a licensed person as defined in the Moscone-Knox Professional Corporation Act.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 4998.4 by Stats. 1999, Ch. 657, Sec. 21.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

4998.4.
